Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Charges for electricity by recreational camping area owner. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "commodity rate" has the meaning given in section 327C.015, subdivision 3a; and new text end new text begin (2) "utility provider" has the meaning given in section 327C.015, subdivision 17a. new text end new text begin (b) A recreational camping owner may charge a recreational camping vehicle only for the vehicle's use of electricity at a rate no more than the commodity rate the owner is charged by the utility provider. new text end new text begin (c) A charge under paragraph (b) must not include any amount for administrative costs, capital costs, or any other expenses associated with distribution or use of utility services, including meter or service charges, demand charges, or taxes. new text end new text begin (d) Any violation of this subdivision is a violation of a law referred to in section 8.31, subdivision 1. new text end